Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2212
Death or disqualification of shareholder;
purchase or redemption of shares; death or disqualification of last remaining
shareholder; powers of successor in interest.

(1) The articles
of incorporation or the bylaws of the professional corporation shall provide
for the purchase or redemption of the shares of any shareholder upon his or
her death or disqualification to render the professional services of the professional
corporation within this state.

(2) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the
bylaws of the professional corporation, upon the death or disqualification
of the last remaining shareholder of a professional corporation, a successor
in interest to such deceased or disqualified shareholder may dissolve the
corporation and wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, notwithstanding
the fact that such successor in interest could not have become a shareholder
of the professional corporation. The successor in interest may file articles
of dissolution with the Secretary of State in accordance with section 21-2,186. Thereafter, the successor in interest
may wind up and liquidate the corporation's business and affairs in accordance
with section 21-2,188 and notify claimants
in accordance with sections 21-2,189
and 21-2,190.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 12, p. 558;

Laws 2010, LB759, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 273.